Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 4. Stock Gambling

§ 2171.
“Bucket shops”.

A person or corporation shall not keep or cause to be kept a “bucket shop,” office, store, or other place in which it is conducted or permitted the pretended buying or selling of stock or bonds of a corporation, or petroleum, cotton, grain, provisions, pork, or other produce, either on margins or otherwise, without any intention of receiving and paying for the property so bought, or of delivering the property so sold; or in which is conducted or permitted the pretended buying or selling of such property on margins; or when the party buying or offering to buy such property does not intend actually to receive the same if purchased, or the person selling such property to deliver it if sold.

§ 2172.
Evidence.

If stocks or bonds are in any manner quoted in such places, or the word “corporation,” “association,” or “company,” or an abbreviation thereof, used therein and therewith, it shall be prima facie evidence that such stocks or bonds are the stocks or bonds of then going corporations.
If such stocks or bonds, or such petroleum, cotton, grain, provisions, pork, or other produce are not actually received when purchased or actually delivered when sold, it shall be prima facie evidence that:

such property was sold or purchased without any intention of receiving it or paying for or delivering it;

such property was bought or sold on margins; and

the parties buying or offering to buy or selling such property did not intend actually to receive or deliver the same.

§ 2173.
Penalties.

A person or corporation, whether acting individually, or as a member, officer, agent, or employee of a corporation, who violates a provision of section 2171 of this title shall be fined not more than $1,000.00 nor less than $200.00.
A person who is guilty of a second offense, in addition to the penalty above prescribed, shall be imprisoned six months and, if a corporation, shall be liable to forfeit its charter.
The continuance of such establishment after a first conviction shall be deemed a second offense.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§ 2174.
What constitutes offense; accessories.

The offense shall be complete against a person or corporation pretending or offering to sell or to buy, as provided in sections 2171 and 2172 of this title, whether the offer to sell or buy is accepted or not.
A person or corporation communicating, receiving, exhibiting, or displaying in any manner such offer so to buy or sell or any statements or quotations of the prices of such property, with a view to such transaction, shall be deemed an accessory and shall be punished as provided in section 2173 of this title.

§ 2175.
Commission merchants to furnish statement of contract.

A person or corporation doing business as a commission merchant or broker shall furnish, on demand, to a customer or principal for whom such person or corporation has executed an order for the actual purchase or sale of any of the commodities mentioned in sections 2171 and 2172 of this title, either for immediate or future delivery, a written statement containing the names of the parties from whom such property was bought, or to whom sold, the time when, place where, and price at which the same was bought or sold.
If such person or corporation refuses promptly to furnish such statement upon reasonable demand, such refusal shall be prima facie evidence that such property was not bought or sold in a legitimate manner.

§ 2176.
Liability of landlords.

A person who knowingly permits any of the illegal acts mentioned in sections 2171-2175 of this title in a building, booth, or erection of which he or she has the care or possession shall be fined not more than $1,000.00 nor less than $500.00. A penalty so adjudged shall be a lien upon the premises on or in which such unlawful acts are carried on or permitted.

§ 2177.
Restraint by injunction; costs.

When a prosecution is commenced for the violation of a provision of sections 2171, 2173, 2174, or 2176 of this title, the State’s Attorney may petition the presiding judge of the Superior Court to enjoin the carrying on of such unlawful business in the place where the complaint, information, or indictment charges that it has been conducted.
Such presiding judge shall hear and determine such petition in the manner provided by law and the rules of civil procedure for the determination of causes and may, if the allegations therein are sustained, permanently enjoin the person, firm, or corporation shown to have kept or caused to have been kept such place, from conducting such prohibited business therein. The Superior Court or presiding judge may, upon petition therefor in such proceedings, issue a temporary injunction to effect, during the pendency of the petition, the closing of such place against such unlawful business.
The costs of the proceedings authorized by this section shall be taxed against the defendant in case the State prevails.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 236, eff. March 29, 1972; 1973, No. 193 (Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974.